Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 11. Out-of-State Credit Unions.

§ 6.2-1379.
Out-of-state credit unions.

A credit union organized and doing business in another state may conduct business as a credit union in the Commonwealth with the approval of the Commission. The Commission shall grant such approval if it shall find that the out-of-state credit union:

Is a credit union duly organized under the laws of another state that would allow credit unions organized in the Commonwealth to conduct business in that state;

Has share insurance for its members;

Reasonably needs to establish a place of business in the Commonwealth to adequately serve its members in the Commonwealth;

Is examined and supervised by the supervisory authority of the state in which the out-of-state credit union is organized; and

Has filed an application with the Commission to conduct such business.

The out-of-state credit union shall:

Grant loans at rates of interest not in excess of the rates permitted for credit unions organized under the laws of the Commonwealth;

Comply with the same consumer protection provisions that credit unions organized under the laws of the Commonwealth are required to obey;

Designate and maintain a registered agent in the Commonwealth;

Submit all examination reports from its supervisory agency to the Commission;

Have any insurer of shares designate an agent for service of process and agree that in the absence of such designation service may be upon the clerk of the Commission;

Inform the members of the credit union who use any facility authorized pursuant to this section of the state where the organization, supervision, and share insurance of the credit union are, and of the fact that it is not regulated, supervised, or insured by any agency of the Commonwealth; and

Comply with §

6.2-1326

.

Credit unions organized in the Commonwealth may establish offices outside the Commonwealth upon approval of the Commission.

The Commission may suspend or revoke the authority of an out-of-state credit union to do business in the Commonwealth if the Commission finds that such credit union is not in compliance with the requirements of this section.

History.

1985, c. 552, § 6.1-208.6; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.61; 1993, c. 59; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1380.
Examinations; periodic reports; cooperative agreements; assessment of fees.

The Commission may make such examinations of an out-of-state credit union conducting business in the Commonwealth pursuant to §

6.2-1379

as the Commission may deem necessary to determine whether the credit union is operating in compliance with the laws of the Commonwealth or to ensure that any office or facility of the out-of-state credit union is being operated in a safe and sound manner. The provisions of §

6.2-1309

shall apply to such examinations.

The Commission shall require periodic reports from any out-of-state credit union that so conducts business in the Commonwealth. Such reports shall be filed under oath with such frequency and in such scope and detail as may be appropriate for the purpose of assuring continuing compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

The Commission may enter into cooperative agreements with appropriate state credit union supervisors and federal credit union agencies for the examination of any office or facility in the Commonwealth of an out-of-state credit union, or any office or facility of a Virginia credit union in any host state, and may accept such supervisors’ and agencies’ reports of examination and reports of investigation in lieu of conducting its own examinations or investigations. The Commission may enter into joint actions with other state credit union supervisors and federal agencies having concurrent jurisdiction over any such out-of-state credit union or any branch of a Virginia credit union, or may take such actions independently to carry out its responsibilities under this article and to assure compliance with the laws of the Commonwealth.

Out-of-state credit unions may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay supervisory and examination fees in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth and regulations of the Commission. Such fees may be shared with other state and federal regulators and agencies in accordance with agreements between them and the Commission.

History.

1998, c. 23, § 6.1-225.61:1; 2010, c. 794.